District of Columbia statutes.
50-2302.04

Notice of infraction.

(a)

The notice of infraction shall be the summons and complaint for the purposes of this subchapter. The Director shall prescribe the form of the notice of infraction and shall establish procedures for the proper administrative controls over the dispersal thereof. The notice of infraction may be the same as the uniform traffic violation notice.

(b)

The notice of infraction shall contain information advising the person to whom it is issued of the manner in which and the time within which he may answer the infraction alleged in the notice.

(c)

The notice of infraction shall advise the person to whom it is issued that his failure to answer the notice of infraction within 60 calendar days from the date of issuance or greater period established by the Director by regulation shall by operation of law result in a suspension of his District operator’s permit or, in the case of a person who is not a resident of the District, his privilege to drive within the District, pending his compliance with § 50-2302.05.

(d)

If a hearing examiner determines that a notice of infraction is defective on its face, he shall enter an order dismissing the notice of infraction and promptly notify the person to whom it was issued.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 204, 25 DCR 1275
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 302(d), 48 DCR 2057
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 301(b), 54 DCR 903
July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-127, § 3(e), 61 DCR 5711

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-614.
1973 Ed., § 40-1112.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-289, in subsec. (c), substituted “30 calendar days” for “15 calendar days”; and, in subsec. (d), substituted “on its face, for reasons other than compliance with subsection (c) of this section” for “on its face”.
D.C. Law 16-279, in subsec. (c), increased the time for which a person has to answer the notice of infraction from 30 calendar days to 60 calendar days.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-127 deleted “for reasons other than compliance with subsection (c) of this section” following “on its face” in (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.